District of Columbia statutes.
8-1321

Confidential business information.

No trade secret or commercial or financial information submitted by a business to the District government pursuant to the requirements of this subchapter shall be disclosed to the public, if the Mayor determines that the disclosure would result in a substantial harm to the competitive position of the business in accordance with § 2-534(a)(1).

History

Mar. 16, 1978, D.C. Law 2-64, § 23
as added Mar. 8, 1991, D.C. Law 8-229, title I, § 102(c), 38 DCR 246

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-737.